California statutes. Commercial Code
 of a security entitlement, securities account, or commodity account is sufficient if it describes either of the following:

(1) The collateral by those terms or as investment property.

(2) The underlying financial asset or commodity contract.

(e) A description only by type of collateral defined in this code is an insufficient description of either of the following:

(1) A commercial tort claim.

(2) In a consumer transaction, consumer goods, a security entitlement, a securities account, or a commodity account.

(f) A description of investment property collateral also shall meet the applicable requirements of Section 1799.103 of
 the Civil Code. A description of consumer goods also shall meet the applicable requirements of Section 1799.100 of the Civil Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9109.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), this division applies to each of the following:

(1) A transaction, regardless of its form, that creates a security interest in personal property or fixtures by contract.

(2) An agricultural lien.

(3) A sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes.

(4) A consignment.

(5) A security interest arising under Section 2401
 or 2505, subdivision (3) of Section 2711, or subdivision (e) of Section 10508, as provided in Section 9110.

(6) A security interest arising under Section 4210 or 5118.

(b) The application of this division to a security interest in a secured obligation is not affected by the fact that the obligation is itself secured by a transaction or interest to which this division does not apply.

(c) This division does not apply to the extent that either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) A statute, regulation, or treaty of the United States preempts this division.

(2) The rights of a transferee
 beneficiary or nominated person under a letter of credit are independent and superior under Section 5114.

(d) This division does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A landlord’s lien, other than an agricultural lien.

(2) A lien, other than an agricultural lien, given by statute or other rule of law for services or materials, however Section 9333 applies with respect to priority of the lien.

(3) An assignment of a claim for wages, salary, or other compensation of an employee.

(4) A sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes as part of a sale of the business out of which
 they arose.

(5) An assignment of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes which is for the purpose of collection only.

(6) An assignment of a right to payment under a contract to an assignee that is also obligated to perform under the contract.

(7) An assignment of a single account, payment intangible, or promissory note to an assignee in full or partial satisfaction of a preexisting indebtedness.

(8) A loan made by an insurance company pursuant to the provisions of a policy or contract issued by it and upon the sole security of the policy or contract.

(9) An
 assignment of a right represented by a judgment, other than a judgment taken on a right to payment that was collateral.

(10) A right of recoupment or setoff, provided that both of the following sections apply:

(A) Section 9340 applies with respect to the effectiveness of rights of recoupment or setoff against deposit accounts.

(B) Section 9404 applies with respect to defenses or claims of an account debtor.

(11) The creation or transfer of an interest in or lien on real property, including a lease or rents thereunder, except to the extent that provision is made for each of the following:

(A) Liens on real
 property pursuant to Sections 9203 and 9308.

(B) Fixtures pursuant to Section 9334.

(C) Fixture filings pursuant to Sections 9501, 9502, 9512, 9516, and 9519.

(D) Security agreements covering personal and real property pursuant to Section 9604.

(12) An assignment of a claim arising in tort, other than a commercial tort claim, however Sections 9315 and 9322 apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds.

(13) An assignment of a deposit account in a consumer transaction, however Sections 9315 and 9322 apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds.

(14) A security interest created by the assignment of the benefits of a public construction contract under the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code).

(15) Transition property, as defined in Section 840 of the Public Utilities Code, except to the extent that the provisions of this division are referred to in Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 840) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, recovery property, as defined in Section 848 of the Public Utilities Code, except to the extent that the provisions of this division are referred to in Article 5.6 (commencing with Section 848) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, and water supply property, as defined in Section
 849 of the Public Utilities Code, except to the extent that the provisions of this division are referred to in Article 5.7 (commencing with Section 849) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(16) A claim or right of an employee or employee’s dependents to receive workers’ compensation under Division 1 (commencing with Section 50) or Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code.

(17) A transfer by a government or governmental unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 482, Sec. 4.   (SB 936)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9110.

A security interest arising under Section 2401 or 2505, or under subdivision (3) of Section 2711, or subdivision (e) of Section 10508 is subject to this division. However, until the debtor obtains possession of the goods, all of the following apply:

(1) The security interest is enforceable, even if paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 9203 has not been satisfied.

(2) Filing is not required to perfect the
 security interest.

(3) The rights of the secured party after default by the debtor are governed by Division 2 (commencing with Section 2101) or Division 10 (commencing with Section 10101).

(4) The security interest has priority over a conflicting security interest created by the debtor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Effectiveness of Security Agreement: Attachment of Security Interest: Rights of Parties to Security Agreement [9201. - 9210.]

9201.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this code, a security agreement is effective according to its terms between the parties, against purchasers of the collateral, and against creditors.

(b) A transaction subject to this division is subject to any applicable rule of law which establishes a different rule for consumers; to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code; Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17500) of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code; the Retail Installment Sales Act, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1801) of Title 2 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code; the Automobile Sales Finance Act, Chapter 2b (commencing with Section 2981)
 of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code; Part 4 (commencing with Section 1738) of Division 3 of the Civil Code, with respect to the applicable provisions of Titles 1 (commencing with Section 1738), 1.3 (commencing with Section 1747), 1.3A (commencing with Section 1748.10), 1.3B (commencing with Section 1748.20), 1.4 (commencing with Section 1749), 1.5 (commencing with Section 1750), 1.6 (commencing with Section 1785.1), 1.61 (commencing with Section 1785.41), 1.6A (commencing with Section 1786), 1.6B (commencing with Section 1787.1), 1.6C (commencing with Section 1788), 1.6D (commencing with Section 1789), 1.6E (commencing with Section 1789.10), 1.6F (commencing with Section 1789.30), 1.7 (commencing with Section 1790), 1.8 (commencing with Section 1798), 1.83 (commencing with Section 1799.5), 1.84 (commencing with Section 1799.8), 1.85 (commencing with Section 1799.90), 1.86 (commencing with Section 1799.200), 2 (commencing with Section 1801), 2.4 (commencing with Section 1812.50), 2.5
 (commencing with Section 1812.80), 2.6 (commencing with Section 1812.100), 2.7 (commencing with Section 1812.200), 2.8 (commencing with Section 1812.300), 2.9 (commencing with Section 1812.400), 2.95 (commencing with Section 1812.600), 2.96 (commencing with Section 1812.620), 3 (commencing with Section 1813), 4 (commencing with Section 1884), and 14 (commencing with Section 2872); the Industrial Loan Law, Division 7 (commencing with Section 18000) of the Financial Code; the Pawnbroker Law, Division 8 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Financial Code; the California Financing Law, Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) of the Financial Code; and the Mobilehomes-Manufactured Housing Act of 1980, Part 2 (commencing with Section 18000) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code; and to any applicable consumer protection statute, regulation, or law.

(c) In case of conflict between this division and a rule of law, statute, or regulation
 described in subdivision (b), the rule of law, statute, or regulation controls. Failure to comply with a statute or regulation described in subdivision (b) has only the effect the statute or regulation specifies.

(d) This division does not do either of the following:

(1) Validate any rate, charge, agreement, or practice that violates a rule of law, statute, or regulation described in subdivision (b).

(2) Extend the application of the rule of law, statute, or regulation to a transaction not otherwise subject to it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 143, Sec. 20.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9202.

Except as otherwise provided with respect to consignments or sales of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes, the provisions of this article with regard to rights and obligations apply whether title to collateral is in the secured party or the debtor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9203.

(a) A security interest attaches to collateral when it becomes enforceable against the debtor with respect to the collateral, unless an agreement expressly postpones the time of attachment.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (c) to (i), inclusive, a security interest is enforceable against the debtor and third parties with respect to the collateral only if each of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) Value has been given.

(2) The debtor has rights in the collateral or the power to transfer rights in the
 collateral to a secured party.

(3) One of the following conditions is met:

(A) The debtor has signed a security agreement that provides a description of the collateral and, if the security interest covers timber to be cut, a description of the land concerned.

(B) The collateral is not a certificated security and is in the possession of the secured party under Section 9313 pursuant to the debtor’s security agreement.

(C) The collateral is a certificated security in registered form and the security certificate has been delivered to the secured party under Section 8301 pursuant to the debtor’s security agreement.

(D) The
 collateral is controllable accounts, controllable electronic records, controllable payment intangibles, deposit accounts, electronic documents, electronic money, investment property, or letter-of-credit rights and the secured party has control under Section 7106, 9104, 9105.1, 9106, 9107, or 9107.1 pursuant to the debtor’s security agreement.

(E) The collateral is chattel paper and the secured party has possession and control under Section 9314.1 pursuant to the debtor’s security agreement.

(c) Subdivision (b) is subject to Section 4210 on the security interest of a collecting bank, Section 5118 on the security interest of a letter-of-credit issuer or nominated person, Section 9110 on a security interest arising under Division 2 (commencing with Section 2101) or Division
 10 (commencing with Section 10101), and Section 9206 on security interests in investment property.

(d) A person becomes bound as debtor by a security agreement entered into by another person if, by operation of law other than this division or by contract, either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The security agreement becomes effective to create a security interest in the person’s property.

(2) The person becomes generally obligated for the obligations of the other person, including the obligation secured under the security agreement, and acquires or succeeds to all or substantially all of the assets of the other person.

(e) If a new debtor becomes
 bound as debtor by a security agreement entered into by another person, both of the following apply:

(1) The agreement satisfies paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) with respect to existing or after-acquired property of the new debtor to the extent the property is described in the agreement.

(2) Another agreement is not necessary to make a security interest in the property enforceable.

(f) The attachment of a security interest in collateral gives the secured party the rights to proceeds provided by Section 9315 and is also attachment of a security interest in a supporting obligation for the collateral.

(g) The attachment of a security interest in a right to
 payment or performance secured by a security interest or other lien on personal or real property is also attachment of a security interest in the security interest, mortgage, or other lien.

(h) The attachment of a security interest in a securities account is also attachment of a security interest in the security entitlements carried in the securities account.

(i) The attachment of a security interest in a commodity account is also attachment of a security interest in the commodity contracts carried in the commodity account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 30.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9204.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), a security agreement may create or provide for a security interest in after-acquired collateral.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), a security interest does not attach under a term constituting an after-acquired property clause to either of the following:

(1) Consumer goods, other than an accession when given as additional security, unless the debtor acquires rights in them within 10 days after the secured party gives value.

(2) A commercial tort claim.

(c) Subdivision (b) does not prevent a security interest from attaching to any of the following:

(1) Consumer goods as proceeds under subdivision (a) of Section 9315 or commingled goods under subdivision (c) of Section 9336.

(2) A commercial tort claim as proceeds under subdivision (a) of Section 9315.

(3) Property that is the proceeds of consumer goods or a commercial tort claim under an after-acquired property clause.

(d) A security agreement may provide that collateral secures, or that accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes are sold in connection with, future advances or
 other value, whether or not the advances or value are given pursuant to commitment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 31.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9205.

(a) A security interest is not invalid or fraudulent against creditors solely because either of the following applies:

(1) The debtor has the right or ability to do any of the following:

(A) Use, commingle, or dispose of all or part of the collateral, including returned or repossessed goods.

(B) Collect, compromise, enforce, or otherwise deal with collateral.

(C) Accept the return of collateral or make repossessions.

(D) Use, commingle, or dispose of proceeds.

(2) The secured party fails to require the debtor to account for proceeds or replace collateral.

(b) This section does not relax the requirements of possession if attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest depends upon possession of the collateral by the secured party.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Addition and amendment operative July 1, 2001, by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 75, and Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

9206.

(a) A security interest in favor of a securities intermediary attaches to a person’s security entitlement if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person buys a financial asset through the securities intermediary in a transaction in which the person is obligated to pay the purchase price to the securities intermediary at the time of the purchase.

(2) The securities intermediary credits the financial asset to the buyer’s securities account before the buyer pays the securities intermediary.

(b) The security interest described in subdivision (a) secures the person’s obligation to pay for the financial asset.

(c) A security interest in favor of a person that delivers a certificated security or other financial asset represented by a writing attaches to the security or other financial asset if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The security or other financial asset satisfies both of the following:

(A) In the ordinary course of business it is transferred by delivery with any necessary endorsement or assignment.

(B) It is delivered under an agreement between persons in the business of dealing with those securities or financial assets.

(2) The agreement calls for delivery against payment.

(d) The security interest described in subdivision (c) secures the obligation to make payment for the delivery.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9207.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), a secured party shall use reasonable care in the custody and preservation of collateral in the secured party’s possession. In the case of chattel paper or an instrument, reasonable care includes taking necessary steps to preserve rights against prior parties unless otherwise agreed.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), if a secured party has possession of collateral, all of the following apply:

(1) Reasonable expenses, including the cost of insurance and payment of taxes or other charges, incurred in the custody, preservation,
 use, or operation of the collateral are chargeable to the debtor and are secured by the collateral.

(2) The risk of accidental loss or damage is on the debtor to the extent of a deficiency in any effective insurance coverage.

(3) The secured party shall keep the collateral identifiable, but fungible collateral may be commingled.

(4) The secured party may use or operate the collateral for any of the following purposes:

(A) For the purpose of preserving the collateral or its value.

(B) As permitted by an order of a court having competent jurisdiction.

(C) Except in the case of consumer goods, in the manner and to the extent agreed by the debtor.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), a secured party having possession of collateral or control of collateral under Section 7106, 9104, 9105, 9105.1, 9106, 9107, or 9107.1 may or shall, as the case may be, do all of the following:

(1) May hold as additional security any proceeds, except money or funds, received from the collateral.

(2) Shall apply money or funds received from the collateral to reduce the secured obligation, unless remitted to the debtor.

(3) May create a security interest in the collateral.

(d) If the secured party is a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes or a consignor, both of the following apply:

(1) Subdivision (a) does not apply unless the secured party is entitled under an agreement to either of the following:

(A) To charge back uncollected collateral.

(B) Otherwise to full or limited recourse against the debtor or a secondary obligor based on the nonpayment or other default of an account debtor or other obligor on the collateral.

(2) Subdivisions (b) and (c) do not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 32.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9208.

(a) This section applies to cases in which there is no outstanding secured obligation and the secured party is not committed to make advances, incur obligations, or otherwise give value.

(b) Within 10 days after receiving a signed demand by the debtor, all of the following apply:

(1) A secured party having control of a deposit account under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 9104 shall send to the bank with which the deposit account is maintained
 a signed record that releases the bank from any further obligation to comply with instructions originated by the secured party.

(2) A secured party having control of a deposit account under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 9104 shall do either of the following:

(A) Pay the debtor the balance on deposit in the deposit account.

(B) Transfer the balance on deposit into a deposit account in the debtor’s name.

(3) A secured party, other than a buyer, having control under Section 9105 of an authoritative electronic copy of a record evidencing chattel paper shall transfer control of the electronic copy to the debtor or a person
 designated by the debtor.

(4) A secured party having control of investment property under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 8106 or under subdivision (b) of Section 9106 shall send to the securities intermediary or commodity intermediary with which the security entitlement or commodity contract is maintained a signed record that releases the securities intermediary or commodity intermediary from any further obligation to comply with entitlement orders or directions originated by the secured party.

(5) A secured party having control of a letter-of-credit right under Section 9107 shall send to each person having an unfulfilled obligation to pay or deliver proceeds of the letter of credit to the secured party a signed release from any further obligation to pay or
 deliver proceeds of the letter of credit to the secured party.

(6) A secured party having control under Section 7106 of an authoritative electronic copy of an electronic document of title shall transfer control of the electronic copy to the debtor or a person designated by the debtor.

(7) A secured party having control under Section 9105.1 of electronic money shall transfer control of the electronic money to the debtor or a person designated by the debtor.

(8) A secured party having control under Section 12105 of a controllable electronic record, other than a buyer of a controllable account or controllable payment intangible evidenced by the controllable electronic record, shall transfer control of the controllable
 electronic record to the debtor or a person designated by the debtor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 33.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9209.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), this section applies if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) There is no outstanding secured obligation.

(2) The secured party is not committed to make advances, incur obligations, or otherwise give value.

(b) Within 10 days after receiving a signed demand by the debtor, a secured party shall send to an account debtor that has received notification under subdivision (a) of Section 9406 or subdivision (b) of Section 12106 of an assignment to the secured party as
 assignee a signed record that releases the account debtor from any further obligation to the secured party.

(c) This section does not apply to an assignment constituting the sale of an account, chattel paper, or payment intangible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 34.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9210.

(a) In this section:

(1) “Request” means a record of a type described in paragraph (2), (3), or (4).

(2) “Request for an accounting” means a record signed by a debtor requesting that the recipient provide an accounting of the unpaid obligations secured by collateral and reasonably identifying the transaction or relationship that is the subject of the request.

(3) “Request regarding a list of collateral” means a record
 signed by a debtor requesting that the recipient approve or correct a list of what the debtor believes to be the collateral securing an obligation and reasonably identifying the transaction or relationship that is the subject of the request.

(4) “Request regarding a statement of account” means a record signed by a debtor requesting that the recipient approve or correct a statement indicating what the debtor believes to be the aggregate amount of unpaid obligations secured by collateral as of a specified date and reasonably identifying the transaction or relationship that is the subject of the request.

(b) Subject to subdivisions (c), (d), (e), and (f), a secured party, other than a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes or a
 consignor, shall comply with a request within 14 days after receipt as follows:

(1) In the case of a request for an accounting, by signing and sending to the debtor an accounting.

(2) In the case of a request regarding a list of collateral or a request regarding a statement of account, by signing and sending to the debtor an approval or correction.

(c) A secured party that claims a security interest in all of a particular type of collateral owned by the debtor may comply with a request regarding a list of collateral by sending to the debtor a signed record including a statement to that effect within 14 days after receipt.

(d) A person that receives a request
 regarding a list of collateral, claims no interest in the collateral when it receives the request, and claimed an interest in the collateral at an earlier time shall comply with the request within 14 days after receipt by sending to the debtor a signed record that contains both of the following:

(1) It disclaims any interest in the collateral.

(2) If known to the recipient, it provides the name and mailing address of any assignee of or successor to the recipient’s interest in the collateral.

(e) A person that receives a request for an accounting or a request regarding a statement of account, claims no interest in the obligations when it receives the request, and claimed an interest in the obligations at an earlier
 time shall comply with the request within 14 days after receipt by sending to the debtor a signed record that contains both of the following:

(1) It disclaims any interest in the obligations.

(2) If known to the recipient, it provides the name and mailing address of any assignee of or successor to the recipient’s interest in the obligations.

(f) A debtor is entitled without charge to one response to a request under this section during any six-month period. The secured party may require payment of a charge not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25) for each additional response.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 35.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Perfection and Priority [9301. - 9342.]

9301.

Except as otherwise provided in Sections 9303 to 9306.2, inclusive, the following rules determine the law governing perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in collateral:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, while a debtor is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in collateral.

(2) While collateral is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection,
 and the priority of a possessory security interest in that collateral.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (4), while negotiable tangible documents, goods, instruments, or tangible money is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs all of the following:

(A) Perfection of a security interest in the goods by filing a fixture filing.

(B) Perfection of a security interest in timber to be cut.

(C) The effect of perfection or nonperfection and the priority of a nonpossessory security interest in the collateral.

(4) The local law of the jurisdiction in which the
 wellhead or minehead is located governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in as-extracted collateral.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 36.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9302.

While farm products are located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of an agricultural lien on the farm products.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9303.

(a) This section applies to goods covered by a certificate of title, even if there is no other relationship between the jurisdiction under whose certificate of title the goods are covered and the goods or the debtor.

(b) Goods become covered by a certificate of title when a valid application for the certificate of title and the applicable fee are delivered to the appropriate authority. Goods cease to be covered by a certificate of title at the earlier of the time the certificate of title ceases to be effective under the law of the issuing jurisdiction or the time the goods become covered subsequently by a certificate of title issued by another jurisdiction.

(c) The local law of the jurisdiction under whose certificate of title the goods are covered governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in goods covered by a certificate of title from the time the
 goods become covered by the certificate of title until the goods cease to be covered by the certificate of title.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9304.

(a) The local law of a bank’s jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a deposit account maintained with that bank even if the transaction does not bear any relation to the bank’s jurisdiction.

(b) The following rules determine a bank’s jurisdiction for purposes of this chapter:

(1) If an agreement between the bank and its customer governing the deposit account expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is the bank’s jurisdiction for purposes of this chapter, this division, or this code, that
 jurisdiction is the bank’s jurisdiction.

(2) If paragraph (1) does not apply and an agreement between the bank and its customer governing the deposit account expressly provides that the agreement is governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the bank’s jurisdiction.

(3) If neither paragraph (1) nor paragraph (2) applies and an agreement between the bank and its customer governing the deposit account expressly provides that the deposit account is maintained at an office in a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the bank’s jurisdiction.

(4) If none of the preceding paragraphs applies, the bank’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the office identified in an
 account statement as the office serving the customer’s account is located.

(5) If none of the preceding paragraphs applies, the bank’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the chief executive office of the bank is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 37.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9305.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), the following rules apply:

(1) While a security certificate is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in the certificated security represented thereby.

(2) The local law of the issuer’s jurisdiction as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 8110 governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in an uncertificated security.

(3) The local law of the securities intermediary’s jurisdiction as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 8110 governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a security entitlement or securities account.

(4) The local law of the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a commodity contract or commodity account.

(5) Paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, apply even if the transaction does not bear any relation to the jurisdiction.

(b) The following rules determine a commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction for
 purposes of this chapter:

(1) If an agreement between the commodity intermediary and commodity customer governing the commodity account expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction for purposes of this chapter, this division, or this code, that jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction.

(2) If paragraph (1) does not apply and an agreement between the commodity intermediary and commodity customer governing the commodity account expressly provides that the agreement is governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction.

(3) If neither paragraph (1) nor paragraph (2) applies and an agreement
 between the commodity intermediary and commodity customer governing the commodity account expressly provides that the commodity account is maintained at an office in a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction.

(4) If none of the preceding paragraphs applies, the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the office identified in an account statement as the office serving the commodity customer’s account is located.

(5) If none of the preceding paragraphs applies, the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the chief executive office of the commodity intermediary is located.

(c) The local law of the jurisdiction in which the
 debtor is located governs all of the following:

(1) Perfection of a security interest in investment property by filing.

(2) Automatic perfection of a security interest in investment property created by a broker or securities intermediary.

(3) Automatic perfection of a security interest in a commodity contract or commodity account created by a commodity intermediary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 38.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9306.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), the local law of the issuer’s jurisdiction or a nominated person’s jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a letter-of-credit right if the issuer’s jurisdiction or nominated person’s jurisdiction is a state.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, an issuer’s jurisdiction or nominated person’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction whose law governs the liability of the issuer or nominated person with respect to the letter-of-credit right as provided in Section 5116.

(c) This section does not apply to a security interest that is perfected only under subdivision (d) of Section 9308.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9306.1.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), if chattel paper is evidenced only by an authoritative electronic copy of the chattel paper or is evidenced by an authoritative electronic copy and an authoritative tangible copy, the local law of the chattel paper’s jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in the chattel paper, even if the transaction does not bear any relation to the chattel paper’s jurisdiction.

(b) The following rules determine the chattel paper’s jurisdiction under this section:

(1) If the authoritative electronic
 copy of the record evidencing chattel paper, or a record attached to or logically associated with the electronic copy and readily available for review, expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is the chattel paper’s jurisdiction for purposes of this chapter, division, or code, that jurisdiction is the chattel paper’s jurisdiction.

(2) If paragraph (1) does not apply and the rules of the system in which the authoritative electronic copy is recorded are readily available for review and expressly provide that a particular jurisdiction is the chattel paper’s jurisdiction for purposes of this chapter, this division, or this code, that jurisdiction is the chattel paper’s jurisdiction.

(3) If paragraphs (1) and (2) do not apply and the authoritative electronic copy, or a
 record attached to or logically associated with the electronic copy and readily available for review, expressly provides that the chattel paper is governed by the law of a particular
 jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the chattel paper’s jurisdiction.

(4) If paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, do not apply and the rules of the system in which the authoritative electronic copy is recorded are readily available for review and expressly provide that the chattel paper or the system is governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the chattel paper’s jurisdiction.

(5) If paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, do not apply, the chattel paper’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the debtor is located.

(c) If an authoritative tangible copy of a record evidences chattel paper and the chattel paper is not evidenced by an authoritative electronic copy, while the authoritative tangible copy of
 the record evidencing chattel paper is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs both of the following:

(1) Perfection of a security interest in the chattel paper by possession under Section 9314.1.

(2) The effect of perfection or nonperfection and the priority of a security interest in the chattel paper.
